Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1233
License; issuance; limitations.

The State Racing Commission shall not issue a license for a teleracing facility unless the local governing body of the city or village in which such facility is proposed or of the county, if the facility is not within the corporate limits of a city or village, has by ordinance or resolution approved the operation of the facility within such jurisdiction.

Laws 1992, LB 718, § 11.